Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-210
Chief deputy election
commissioner; vacancy; procedure for filling.

The
election commissioner in counties having a population of more than one hundred
thousand inhabitants shall, within ten days after being appointed or being
notified that a vacancy exists in the office of chief deputy election commissioner,
notify by registered or certified mail the county chairperson of the political
parties from which a chief deputy election commissioner may be appointed that
an appointment needs to be made. The county chairperson of the political parties
shall call a meeting of a committee comprised of the county chairperson, vice-chairperson,
secretary, and treasurer of the political parties within ten days after receiving
the letter for the purpose of preparing a list of three or more candidates.
The list shall be submitted to the election commissioner within five days
after the meeting, and the election commissioner shall select a chief deputy
election commissioner from the list of names of candidates submitted within
ten days after receiving all lists.
If a political party does not submit a list within the timeframes required
by this section, the election commissioner shall select a chief deputy election
commissioner from the lists received.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 30;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 15;

Laws 2014, LB946, § 5.